Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1984 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982, and in 1984, 1987, 1995, and 2006 to make other minor word changes under AS

01.05.031

.

Cross references. —

For collective bargaining by public employees, see AS 23.40.